Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-327.01
Department of Health and Human Services; printed materials; duties; availability; Internet website information; reporting form; contents.

(1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall cause to be published the following easily comprehensible printed materials:

(a) Geographically indexed materials designed to inform the woman of public and private agencies and services available to assist a woman through pregnancy, upon childbirth, and while the child is dependent, including adoption agencies and agencies and services for prevention of unintended pregnancies, which materials shall include a comprehensive list of the agencies available, a description of the services they offer, and a description of the manner, including telephone numbers and addresses in which such agencies may be contacted or printed materials including a toll-free, twenty-four-hour-a-day telephone number which may be called to orally obtain such a list and description of agencies in the locality of the caller and of the services they offer;

(b) Materials designed to inform the woman of the probable anatomical and physiological characteristics of the unborn child at two-week gestational increments from the time when a woman can be known to be pregnant to full term, including pictures or drawings representing the development of unborn children at the two-week gestational increments, and any relevant information on the possibility of the unborn child's survival. Any such pictures or drawings shall contain the dimensions of the unborn child and shall be realistic and appropriate for the stage of pregnancy depicted. The materials shall be objective, nonjudgmental, and designed to convey only accurate scientific information about the unborn child at the various gestational ages. The materials shall also contain objective information describing the methods of abortion procedures commonly employed, the medical risks commonly associated with each such procedure, the possible detrimental psychological effects of abortion, the medical risks commonly associated with abortion, and the medical risks commonly associated with carrying a child to term;

(c) A comprehensive list of health care providers, facilities, and clinics that offer to have ultrasounds performed by a person at least as qualified as a registered nurse licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act, including and specifying those that offer to perform such ultrasounds free of charge. The list shall be arranged geographically and shall include the name, address, hours of operation, and telephone number of each entity;

(d) Materials designed to inform the woman that she may still have a viable pregnancy after taking mifepristone. The materials shall include the following statements: "Research indicates that mifepristone alone is not always effective in ending a pregnancy. You may still have a viable pregnancy after taking mifepristone. If you change your mind and want to continue your pregnancy after taking mifepristone, it may not be too late."; and

(e) Materials, including contact information, that will assist the woman in finding a medical professional who can help her continue her pregnancy after taking mifepristone.

(2) The printed materials shall be printed in a typeface large enough to be clearly legible.

(3) The printed materials required under this section shall be available from the department upon the request by any person, facility, or hospital for an amount equal to the cost incurred by the department to publish the materials.

(4) The Department of Health and Human Services shall make available on its Internet website a printable publication of geographically indexed materials designed to inform the woman of public and private agencies with services available to assist a woman with mental health concerns, following a risk factor evaluation. Such services shall include, but not be limited to, outpatient and crisis intervention services and crisis hotlines. The materials shall include a comprehensive list of the agencies available, a description of the services offered, and a description of the manner in which such agencies may be contacted, including addresses and telephone numbers of such agencies, as well as a toll-free, twenty-four-hour-a-day telephone number to be provided by the department which may be called to orally obtain the names of the agencies and the services they provide in the locality of the woman. The department shall update the publication as necessary.

(5) The Department of Health and Human Services shall publish and make available on its website materials designed to inform the woman that she may still have a viable pregnancy after taking mifepristone. The materials shall include the following statements: "Research indicates that mifepristone alone is not always effective in ending a pregnancy. You may still have a viable pregnancy after taking mifepristone. If you change your mind and want to continue your pregnancy after taking mifepristone, it may not be too late." The materials shall also include information, including contact information, that will assist the woman in finding a medical professional who can help her continue her pregnancy after taking mifepristone.

(6) The Department of Health and Human Services shall review and update, as necessary, the materials, including contact information, regarding medical professionals who can help a woman continue her pregnancy after taking mifepristone.

(7)(a) The Department of Health and Human Services shall prescribe a reporting form which shall be used for the reporting of every attempt at continuing a woman's pregnancy after taking mifepristone as described in this section performed in this state. Such form shall include the following items:

(i) The age of the pregnant woman;

(ii) The location of the facility where the service was performed;

(iii) The type of service provided;

(iv) Complications, if any;

(v) The name of the attending medical professional;

(vi) The pregnant woman's obstetrical history regarding previous pregnancies, abortions, and live births;

(vii) The state of the pregnant woman's legal residence;

(viii) Whether an emergency situation caused the physician to waive any of the requirements of section 28-327; and

(ix) Such other information as may be prescribed in accordance with section 71-602.

(b) The completed form shall be signed by the attending medical professional and sent to the department within fifteen days after each reporting month. The completed form shall be an original, typed or written legibly in durable ink, and shall not be deemed complete unless the omission of any item of information required shall have been disclosed or satisfactorily accounted for. Carbon copies shall not be acceptable. The reporting form shall not include the name of the person for whom the service was provided. The reporting form shall be confidential and shall not be revealed except upon the order of a court of competent jurisdiction in a civil or criminal proceeding.

Laws 1993, LB 110, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 61;

Laws 2009, LB675, § 3;

Laws 2010, LB594, § 12;

Laws 2019, LB209, § 2.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.